Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3013
Central server.

(1) The Tax Commissioner shall establish a central server for purposes of receiving data and accurate revenue and income reporting from cash devices across the State of Nebraska. Such central server shall be in place and operational within one year after July 19, 2024.

(2) Once the central server is operational, each cash device in the State of Nebraska shall be connected at all times to the central server operated by the department. Such central server shall report data including sales, transactions, prizes won and paid, duration of play or transactions, hours of operation, and any other requirements established by the department through adoption and promulgation of rules and regulations to enforce and implement the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act.

Laws 2024, LB685, § 16.